Utah statutes.
48-2e-401.   Becoming general partner.

(1)  A person becomes a general partner:

(a)  upon formation of a limited partnership, as agreed among the persons that are to be the initial partners; and

(b)  after formation:

(i)  as provided in the partnership agreement;

(ii)  under Subsection 48-2e-801(1)(c)(ii) following the dissociation of a limited partnership's last general partner;

(iii)  as the result of a transaction effective under Part 11, Merger, Interest Exchange, Conversion, and Domestication; or

(iv)  with the affirmative vote or consent of all the partners.

(2)  A person may become a general partner without:

(a)  acquiring a transferable interest; or

(b)  making or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

